Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 2. Comprehensive Community Corrections Act
for Local-Responsible Offenders.

§§ 53.1-180 through 53.1-185.3.
Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 491, cl. 2.

Cross references.

For current provisions regarding Comprehensive Community Corrections Act for Local-Responsible Offenders, see §

9.1-173

et seq.